District of Columbia statutes.
42-2706.01

Liberal construction of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter are to be liberally construed so as to effectuate those powers which are specifically enumerated.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-135, § 601, 25 DCR 5008
1981 Ed., § 45-2161.
1973 Ed., § 45-1931.